Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4861
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 61;

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 84.